dev/verb_pardefs.dix
<pardef n="/ënnersichen__vblex">
  <e><p><l>ënnersichen</l><r>ënnersichen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ënnersicht</l><r>ënnersichen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>ënnersichen</l><r>ënnersichen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ënnersichs</l><r>ënnersichen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ënnersicht</l><r>ënnersichen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ënnersichen</l><r>ënnersichen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ënnersicht</l><r>ënnersichen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ënnersichen</l><r>ënnersichen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>ënnersich</l><r>ënnersichen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ënnersicht</l><r>ënnersichen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/ënnerstellen__vblex">
  <e><p><l>ënnerstellen</l><r>ënnerstellen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ënnerstallt</l><r>ënnerstellen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>ënnerstellen</l><r>ënnerstellen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ënnerstells</l><r>ënnerstellen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ënnerstellt</l><r>ënnerstellen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ënnerstellen</l><r>ënnerstellen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ënnerstellt</l><r>ënnerstellen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ënnerstellen</l><r>ënnerstellen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>ënnerstell</l><r>ënnerstellen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ënnerstellt</l><r>ënnerstellen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/ënnersträichen__vblex">
  <e><p><l>ënnersträichen</l><r>ënnersträichen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ënnerstrach</l><r>ënnersträichen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>ënnersträichen</l><r>ënnersträichen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ënnersträichs</l><r>ënnersträichen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ënnersträicht</l><r>ënnersträichen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ënnersträichen</l><r>ënnersträichen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ënnersträicht</l><r>ënnersträichen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ënnersträichen</l><r>ënnersträichen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>ënnersträich</l><r>ënnersträichen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ënnersträicht</l><r>ënnersträichen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/ënnerstëtzen__vblex">
  <e><p><l>ënnerstëtzen</l><r>ënnerstëtzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ënnerstëtzt</l><r>ënnerstëtzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>ënnerstëtzen</l><r>ënnerstëtzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ënnerstëtz</l><r>ënnerstëtzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ënnerstëtzt</l><r>ënnerstëtzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ënnerstëtzen</l><r>ënnerstëtzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ënnerstëtzt</l><r>ënnerstëtzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ënnerstëtzen</l><r>ënnerstëtzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>ënnerstëtz</l><r>ënnerstëtzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ënnerstëtzt</l><r>ënnerstëtzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/ënnertunnelen__vblex">
  <e><p><l>ënnertunnelen</l><r>ënnertunnelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ënnertunnelt</l><r>ënnertunnelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>ënnertunnelen</l><r>ënnertunnelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ënnertunnels</l><r>ënnertunnelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ënnertunnelt</l><r>ënnertunnelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ënnertunnelen</l><r>ënnertunnelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ënnertunnelt</l><r>ënnertunnelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ënnertunnelen</l><r>ënnertunnelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>ënnertunnel</l><r>ënnertunnelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ënnertunnelt</l><r>ënnertunnelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
